Illinois, session 104th, SB1737.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-30.19 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-30.19 new)7    Sec. 5-30.19. Durable medical equipment; MCO reimbursement 8requirement. The Department shall require Medicaid managed 9care organizations to reimburse at no less than 100% of the 10Medical Assistance program's Durable Medical Equipment fee 11schedule for the same service or item of durable medical 12equipment, complex rehab technology, prosthetics, orthotics, 13or supplies. This reimbursement requirement shall also apply 14to a Medicaid managed care organization's subcontractors and 15third-party administrators. The Department has the authority 16to implement the reimbursement requirement on and after July 171, 2025 and prior to the completion of any regulatory process 18undertaken in order to effect such change. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202025.